Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-216
Deeds; acknowledgment required.

The grantor must acknowledge the instrument with an acknowledgment as defined in section 64-205.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 2, p. 280;

R.S.1913, § 6197;

C.S.1922, § 5596;

C.S.1929, § 76-202;

R.S.1943, § 76-216;

Laws 1978, LB 668, § 1.

Acknowledgment must show voluntary execution. Keeling v. Hoyt, 31 Neb. 453, 48 N.W. 66 (1891); Aultman & Taylor Co. v. Jenkins, 19 Neb. 209, 27 N.W. 117 (1886).

Acknowledgment that it was their voluntary act was good. Spitznagle v. Vanhessch, 13 Neb. 338, 14 N.W. 417 (1882).

Substantial compliance with statute is necessary and sufficient. Becker v. Anderson, 11 Neb. 493, 9 N.W. 640 (1881).

Acknowledgment is no part of deed itself. Burbank v. Ellis, 7 Neb. 156 (1878).